California, session 20252026, AB2721.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17211 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:17211. (a) An operator of a hotel with actual knowledge of a reservation with the United States Customs and Border Protection or United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement on its premises shall, no later than the time of arrival of an employee of that federal entity, post a notice in a prominent and accessible place where it can be seen by all workers and guests that discloses the potential presence of the United States Customs and Border Protection or United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement on its premises.(b) The operator shall ensure that the notice remains prominently displayed for the duration of the reservation.(c) An operator who has established a protocol to comply with this section in good faith shall be found in compliance with this section.(d) The hotel and its operator shall not be liable for loss of life, injuries, violations, penalties, liabilities, or any damages that might occur pursuant to compliance with the requirements of this section.(e) This section does not impose any duty on an operator of a hotel to seek information.(f) A violation of this section shall be deemed engaging in unfair competition for purposes of this chapter.(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Hotel” has the same meaning as Section 17210.(2) “Operator” means a person who, at a minimum, meets both of the following criteria:(A) The person is employed directly by the hotel owner or an entity charged with overseeing the day-to-day operations of the hotel.(B) The person is classified as a “manager” by title and works 40 or more hours per week at the hotel.